Connecticut, session 2026, HB05360.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47a-4d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, "tenant screening report" means a credit
report, a criminal background report, an employment history report, a
rental history report or any combination thereof, used by a landlord to
determine the suitability of a prospective tenant.
(b) No landlord may demand from a prospective tenant any
payment, fee or charge for the processing, review or acceptance of any
rental application, or demand any other payment, fee or charge before
or at the beginning of the tenancy, except a security deposit pursuant to
section 47a-21, advance payment for the first month's rent or a deposit
for a key or any special equipment, or a fee for a tenant screening report
as provided in subsection (c) of this section. No landlord may charge a
sHB5360 / File No. 112 1

sHB5360 File No. 112
tenant a move-in or move-out fee.
(c) On and after October 1, 2023, a landlord may charge a fee not
exceeding fifty dollars plus an adjustment reflecting any increase in the
consumer price index for urban consumers, as determined by the
Commissioner of Housing on an annual basis, for a tenant screening
report concerning a prospective tenant.
(d) A landlord that charges a fee for a tenant screening report
concerning a prospective tenant shall provide the prospective tenant
with (1) a copy of the tenant screening report or, if the landlord is
prohibited from providing such a copy, information concerning such
report that would allow such tenant to request a copy of such report
from the service provider that produced such report, and (2) a copy of
the receipt or invoice from the entity conducting the tenant screening
report concerning the prospective tenant.
(e) A landlord shall not deny an application for rental housing on the
basis of credit history if the applicant is a victim of domestic violence, as
defined in section 46b-1. In order to establish the applicant's status as a
victim of domestic violence, an applicant may submit to the landlord (1)
a letter from a domestic violence counselor or sexual assault counselor,
as such terms are defined in section 52-146k, a housing counselor
certified by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development or an attorney representing the applicant; (2) a police
report; or (3) an order of protection issued pursuant to section 46b-15,
46b-16a, 46b-38c, 53a-40e or 54-1k in which the applicant is named as a
protected person and that is in effect at the time such tenant screening
report is issued. Any landlord who violates the provisions of this
subsection shall pay the applicant actual damages, including all
amounts paid to the landlord as an application fee, application deposit
or reimbursement for any of the landlord's out-of-pocket expenses that
were charged to the applicant, along with attorney's fees.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
sHB5360 / File No. 112 2

sHB5360 File No. 112
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-4d
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (e)(1), "counselor" was inserted after "domestic violence",
and "such terms are" was inserted before "defined", and in Subsec.
(e)(3), "order" was changed to "order of protection" and "in which the
applicant is named as a protected person " was added for clarity and
statutory consistency.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5360 / File No. 112 3

sHB5360 File No. 112
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which prohibits landlords from denying certain rental
applications based on applicants' credit history, is not anticipated to
result in a fiscal impact. The state is not a direct residential landlord.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5360 / File No. 112 4

sHB5360 File No. 112
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5360
AN ACT CONCERNING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND TENANT
SCREENING.